Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2364YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 265 Section 1. PUBLIC SAFETY ââ FIRE FIGHTER TRAINING AND 1 CERTIFICATION. By January 1, 2026, the department of public 2 safety shall revise the rules relating to fire fighter training 3 and certification to provide that a person who committed 4 any crime as an adult that resulted in the requirement that 5 the person be listed on a sex offender registry shall not 6 be certified as a fire fighter, including a volunteer fire 7 fighter. 8